Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2620.01
State Board of Education; voluntary accreditation process; rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to establish the voluntary accreditation process referred to in subdivision (10) of section 43-2620.

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 21.